Hawaii statutes.
[§390-3] Certificates of employment and
age. (a) Certificates of employment and age shall be issued by persons
appointed by the director in the form and under conditions prescribed by the
director.

(b) A person designated to issue certificates
of employment may refuse to issue a certificate if in the person's judgment the
nature of the employment or the place thereof is such as to injuriously affect
the health, safety or well-being of the minor or contribute toward the minor's
delinquency.

(c) Every employer receiving a certificate of
employment shall return the certificate to the department immediately after
termination of the employment showing thereon the date of termination.

(d) The department may destroy or dispose of
any certificate of employment on file which was issued on behalf of a minor who
has attained the age of eighteen years and any application for a certificate of
employment or age which was filed with the department more than five years
prior to the destruction or disposition. [L 1969, c 162, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next